Washington statutes.
RCW 43.05.130

Educational programs.

The departments of revenue and labor and industries and the employment security department shall undertake an educational program directed at those who have the most difficulty in determining their tax or premium liability. The departments may rely on information from internal data, trade associations, and businesses to determine which entities should be selected. The educational programs may include, but not be limited to, targeted informational fact sheets, self-audits, or workshops, and may be presented individually by the agency or in conjunction with other agencies.

[ 1995 c 403 s 614.]